Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 1. Powers and Miscellaneous Matters
§ 15-1-104.
Authority to carry liability insurance.

Any city or town may carry liability insurance in an amount the governing body deems necessary. The insurance shall be:

On standard policy forms approved by the state insurance commissioner;

With companies authorized to do business in Wyoming;

Paid out of the general fund of the city or town.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-4; Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 3; 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

For substantive provisions on governmental tort liability, see Wyoming Governmental Claims Act (§

1-39-101

et seq.).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Purchase of liability insurance is a waiver of tort immunity,

at least up to the amount of the coverage. Collins v. Memorial Hosp., 521 P.2d 1339,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1974).

Cited

in

Lutheran Hosps. & Homes Soc'y of America v. Yepsen, 469 P.2d 409,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1970).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Municipal Tort Liability: Purchase of Liability Insurance as a Waiver of Immunity,” see 18 Wyo. L.J. 220 (1964).

For case note on Lutheran Hosps. & Homes Soc'y of America v. Yepsen, 469 P.2d 409,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1970), see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 717 (1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability or indemnity insurance carried by governmental unit as affecting immunity from tort liability, 68 ALR2d 1437.

Validity and construction of statute authorizing or requiring governmental unit to procure liability insurance covering public officers or employees for liability arising out of performance of public duties, 71 ALR3d 6.

Scope of provision in liability policy issued to municipal corporation or similar governmental body limiting coverage to injuries arising out of construction, maintenance or repair work, 30 ALR5th 699.

§ 15-1-105.
Governing bodies; meetings; quorum; executive sessions.

Public meetings of the governing body shall be held in accordance with W.S.

16-4-401

through

16-4-408

. Special meetings may also be called by a majority of the qualified members of the governing body. A majority of all the qualified members of the governing body constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business, but any number may adjourn a meeting to compel the attendance of and punish absent members. If the nature of the business so requires, the governing body by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the members present, may go into executive session and exclude the public therefrom.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-5; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 15, § 1; ch. 34, § 2; 2005, ch. 194, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “16-4-408” for “16-4-407.”

Cross references. —

As to ordinances and resolutions, see §§

15-1-114

to

15-1-119

.

As to mayor's messages in first class cities, see §

15-3-202

.

As to president of governing body in first class cities, see §

15-3-203

.

As to governing body of cities operating under commission form of government, see §§

15-4-101

and

15-4-102

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction and application of statutes making public proceedings open to the public, 38 ALR3d 1070, 34 ALR5th 591.

Abstention from voting of member of municipal council present at session as affecting requisite voting majority, 63 ALR3d 1072.

Emergency exception under state law making proceedings by public bodies open to the public, 33 ALR5th 731.

Attorney-client exception under state law making proceedings by public bodies open to the public, 34 ALR5th 591.

§ 15-1-106.
Conduct and journal of governing body's proceedings.

The governing body shall determine the rules for the conduct of its proceedings, and shall keep a journal thereof which is a public record. The manner in which each member of the governing body votes on any matter upon which a vote is taken shall be entered in the journal.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-6; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 15, § 1.

§ 15-1-107.
Vacancies in offices; grounds; how filled.

A vacancy exists in the office of mayor or councilman if during the term for which elected any mayor or councilman:

Except as provided in W.S.

22-23-103

, fails the residency requirements as defined by local ordinance for the city, town or ward;

Is convicted of a felony;

Fails to attend four (4) or more consecutive regularly scheduled meetings of the council without an excused absence as determined by a majority of the council according to procedures adopted pursuant to subsection (b) of this section; or

Meets any other condition specified in W.S.

22-18-101

.

The governing body, by ordinance, shall specify the procedure for determining whether a vacancy exists.

If a vacancy is determined to exist, the governing body shall appoint an eligible person to the office who shall serve until his successor is elected at the next general municipal election and qualified. If the entire council is vacant, the district judge for the district in which the city or town is located shall appoint a person to fill each vacancy and serve until the next general municipal election at which time a successor shall be elected to fill the unexpired portion of each term.

A vacancy in the office of mayor shall be filled only from the governing body.

Vacancies in appointive offices shall be filled in the manner provided for initial appointments.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-7; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 15, § 1; ch. 34, § 2; 1997, ch. 109, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 69, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to vacancy in office of mayor of first class city, see §

15-3-203

.

§ 15-1-108.
Powers and duties of mayor; appointment of mayor pro tem.

Unless otherwise provided by statute, the mayor shall:

Preside at all meetings of the governing body, and in his absence a councilman shall be appointed to act as mayor pro tem;

Have superintending control of all officers and affairs of the city or town;

Take care that the ordinances and laws are complied with;

Administer oaths;

Sign commissions and appointments and all bonds, contracts and other obligations required to be signed in the name of the city or town; and

Have one (1) vote on all matters coming before the governing body upon which a vote is taken, except a vote:

To override a veto;

To confirm an appointment other than a vote to break a tie vote of the governing body; and

Pursuant to a hearing for removal or discharge as provided in W.S. 15-2-102(b)(iv)(C) or 15-3-204(b)(iv)(C).

Repealed by Laws 1984, ch. 15, § 2.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-8; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 15, § 2; ch. 34, § 2; 1993, ch. 124, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(vi)(C), substituted “W.S. 15-2-102(b)(iv)(C) or 15-3-204(b)(iv)(C)” for “W.S. 15-2-102(b)(iv)(B) or15-3-204(b)(iv)(B).”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 15-1-109.
When clerk may administer oaths.

The clerk of any city or town may administer oaths to persons for any city or town purpose for which an oath is required or authorized by law.

In adding his jurat to any oath he administers, the clerk shall attach the official seal of the city or town to the jurat.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-9; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1985, ch. 209, § 1.

§ 15-1-110.
Minutes of meetings and titles of ordinances passed to be published; exception; contents; publication of salary information of specified officials and employees.

The governing body of any city or town shall designate a legal newspaper and publish once therein the minutes of all regular and special meetings of the governing body and the titles of all ordinances passed. If a newspaper is not published in the city or town the proceedings or ordinances shall be posted for at least ten (10) days in the city or town clerk’s office and in such other places as the governing body determines. The clerk of each city or town shall within twelve (12) days after adjournment of every meeting, furnish the newspaper a copy of the proceedings of the meeting. Except for salaries and wages published under subsection (b) of this section, the copy shall include any bill presented to the governing body stating the amount of the bill, the amount allowed, the purpose of the bill and the claimant. Claims for part-time employees may be summarized by department without listing each part-time employee. The newspaper shall publish the copy of proceedings within nine (9) days after receipt.

A city or town required to publish minutes under subsection (a) of this section shall separately publish:

Within sixty (60) days after the end of each fiscal year, the name, position, base annual salary of and amount of overtime pay paid to each full-time employee and each elected official. A brief statement shall accompany the salary publication specifying that all salaries are listed as base annual salaries or actual wages, not including any benefits such as health insurance costs, life insurance benefits and pension plans. The statement shall also indicate that any overtime the employee earned and was paid by the city or town is included;

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 86, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 86, § 2.

Subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to undercover personnel working in the law enforcement field.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-10; Laws 1973, ch. 212, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1983, ch. 54, § 1; 2014 ch. 86, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2020 ch. 36, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, rewrote (b)(i); and repealed former (b)(ii) and (c) which read: “(ii) During March of each year, a complete list of all chief administrative officials, assistant administrative officials, elected officials, department heads and full-time employees of the city or town specified by name and position, excluding salaries.

“(c) As used in this section, ‘department head’ means any employee responsible for the operation of a major functional area of the city or town who reports directly to the chief administrative official.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b)(i) substituted “position, base annual salary of and amount of overtime pay paid to each” for “position and gross monthly salary of each,” “base annual salaries or actual wages” for “gross monthly salaries or actual monthly wages,” “benefits” for “fringe benefits,” “any overtime the employee earned and was paid” for “the salaries or wages do not include any overtime the employee may earn which would be paid,” and added “is included” at the end.

Intent of legislature in enacting this section

was to insure that the business of each municipality in Wyoming would be subject to public scrutiny with respect to the expenditure of funds for all acquired debts. Record-Times, Inc. v. Wheatland, 650 P.2d 297,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 381

(Wyo. 1982).

Section requires inclusion of listing of employees' salaries in minutes. —

The language of this section requires that cities and towns include a listing of employees' salaries in the minutes of council meetings which are submitted to the designated paper for publication. Record-Times, Inc. v. Wheatland, 650 P.2d 297,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 381

(Wyo. 1982).

Applied

in

Sheridan Newspapers, Inc. v. City of Sheridan, 660 P.2d 785,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1983).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Constitutional Law — A Constitutional Right of Access to State-Held Information. Sheridan Newspapers, Inc. v. City of Sheridan, 660 P.2d 785,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 719 (1984).

§ 15-1-111.
Appropriations for advertisement of resources authorized; exception.

The governing body of any city or town may make appropriations from the city or town general fund for:

Advertising the resources of the city or town;

Furthering its industrial development; or

Encouraging exhibits at fairs, expositions and conventions.

No appropriation may be for the express aid of any private citizen, firm or corporation.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-11; Laws 1979, ch. 85, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to advertising county resources, see §

18-3-521

.

§ 15-1-112.
Manner of disposing of municipal property; when advertising and bids not necessary.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section and W.S. 15-1-113(a), before the sale of any property of any city or town valued at five hundred dollars ($500.00) or more, an advertisement of the intended sale, describing the property and the terms of the sale, shall be published at least once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper having general circulation in the community, announcing a public auction or calling for sealed bids for purchase of the property. The property shall be sold to the highest responsible bidder, unless the governing body of the city or town rejects all bids. The responsibility of the bidders shall be determined by the governing body of the city or town.

Any city or town, upon terms the governing body thereof determines, without advertising the sale or calling for bids, and after a public hearing, notice of which shall include the appraised value of all real properties involved and notice of proposed terms of any contract with an independent agency pursuant to paragraph (iii) of this subsection and is published at least once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the city or town is located, may:

Sell any property to:

The state of Wyoming for the use of any agency or instrumentality thereof;

Any agency or instrumentality of the state or federal government authorized to hold property in its own name;

Any political subdivision of the state;

Any person acquiring the property for a use which the governing body determines will benefit the economic development of the municipality.

Trade any real property the city or town owns for any other real property;

Contract with an independent agent to sell individual parcels of land for development as reasonable cost housing alternatives for prospective homeowners, provided the parcels have not been previously developed beyond the installation of basic utilities and a foundation.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-12; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1985, ch. 209, § 1; 1995, ch. 51, § 1; 1996, ch. 62, § 1; 1998, ch. 96, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to power of cities and towns to convey property, see §

15-1-103

.

Council's discretion. —

In any sale of property made by the city, the council has the right to take into consideration its best economic, financial and industrial interests. Quackenbush v. Cheyenne, 52 Wyo. 146, 70 P.2d 577,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1937).

Equity will not interfere with suit to restrain municipal officers

in exercise of their discretionary power over control or disposition of municipal property, in the absence of illegality, fraud or clear abuse of authority. Quackenbush v. Cheyenne, 52 Wyo. 146, 70 P.2d 577,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1937).

Taxpayers' suit not authorized. —

Mere fact that lots should have been sold for a somewhat higher figure and that sale was improvident does not, in absence of illegality, fraud or clear abuse of discretion authorize a suit on behalf of taxpayers, for the reason that sale of the property is by statute left to judgment of council. Quackenbush v. Cheyenne, 52 Wyo. 146, 70 P.2d 577,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1937).

Exchange of land covered by section. —

Even if the power of a municipal corporation to buy and sell land includes the right to exchange land, the procedures outlined in this section would apply to the exchange. City of Buffalo v. Joslyn, 527 P.2d 1106,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 245

(Wyo. 1974).

Avoiding appearance of unfairness. —

Even where the city officials are so well informed on the matter of a sale or exchange of land that no possible additional information could come to their attention by the advertisement of the intended disposition of city property, it is important to the officials of a city and the residents thereof that any appearance of unfairness be guarded against by complying with the provisions of this section. City of Buffalo v. Joslyn, 527 P.2d 1106,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 245

(Wyo. 1974).

§ 15-1-113.
Contracts for public improvements.

All contracts for any type of public improvement, excluding contracts for professional services or where the primary purpose is emergency work or maintenance, for any city or town or joint powers board wherein at least one (1) member is a municipality shall be advertised for bid or for response if a request for proposal or qualification for construction manager agent, construction manager at risk or design-builder is used, if the estimated cost, including all related costs, exceeds a bid threshold of thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000.00), except that a contract for the purchase or lease of a new automobile or truck shall be advertised regardless of cost and if there is an automobile or truck for trade-in, it shall be included as a part of the advertisement and bid. The requirements of W.S. 15-1-112(a) do not apply to any city or town trading in an automobile or truck on the purchase of a new automobile or truck.

The advertisement shall be published on two (2) different occasions, at least seven (7) days apart, in a newspaper having general circulation in the city or town, or if a joint powers board in any city or town which is a member of the board. The published notice shall state the place, date and time when the bids or proposals will be received and bids will be publicly opened and the place where interested persons may obtain complete specifications of work to be performed.

If the contract is let for bid, the contract shall be let to the lowest bidder who shall be determined qualified and responsible in the sole discretion of the governing body. The governing body may use alternate design and construction delivery methods as defined under W.S.

16-6-701

if deemed appropriate. The governing body may reject all bids or responses submitted if it finds that none of them would serve the public interest. For contracts in excess of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00), cities, towns and joint powers boards may prequalify contractors who wish to submit bids or responses based on such criteria as the project type and experience, expertise, professional qualifications, past performance, staff proposed, schedule proposed, financial strength, qualification of supervisors proposed to be used, technical solutions proposed or references.

Every contract shall be executed by the mayor or in his absence or disability, by the president or other presiding officer of the governing body and by the clerk or designee of the governing body. The successful bidder or respondent shall furnish to the city, town or joint powers board a bond or other form of guarantee in accordance with W.S.

16-6-112

.

Before advertising for a bid for any work on the construction of any public improvements and except as provided under W.S.

16-6-707

for alternate design and construction delivery methods, detailed plans and specifications shall be prepared, together with an estimate of the probable cost and a form of the proposed contract. A city, town or joint powers board may withhold a percentage of the calculated value of any work completed as retainage in accordance with W.S. 16-6-702(b). No progress payment may be made until the city or town engineer or designated local official has furnished the estimate, together with a certificate that the amount of work estimated to have been done conforms in all material respects with the requirements of the contract. A joint powers board may designate an official of any member city or town to perform the functions required by this subsection.

In advertising for any bid, the forms of guarantee required under this section and approved by the city, town or joint powers board shall be specified. In addition, bidders shall be required to accompany each bid with a bid bond or if the bid is one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00) or less, any other form of bid guarantee approved by the city, town or joint powers board, equal to at least five percent (5%) of the total bid amount, with sufficient surety and payable to the city, town or joint powers board. The bid guarantee shall be forfeited as liquidated damages if the bidder, upon the letting of the contract to him, fails to enter into the contract within thirty (30) days after it is presented to him for that purpose or fails to proceed with the performance of the contract. The bid guarantee shall be retained by the city, town or joint powers board until proper bond or other form of security satisfactory to the city, town or joint powers board to secure performance of the contract has been filed and approved. The right to reject any bid is reserved in all bid advertisements. All bids shall be numbered consecutively before they are opened and no further bids may be received after the advertised time of opening bids and any bid is publicly opened. The city, town or joint powers board shall give all persons who desire an opportunity to inspect all bids when they are opened. No bid may be considered unless accompanied by a bid guarantee in the required amount.

No contract for which a bond or other form of financial guarantee approved by the city, town or joint powers board is required may be assigned or transferred in any manner except by operation of law or consent of the governing body endorsed on the contract. Assignment by any other means renders the contract null and void as to any further performance by the contractor or the assignee, without any act on the part of the city, town or joint powers board. The city, town or joint powers board may at once proceed to relet the contract or may at its discretion proceed to complete the contract as agent at the expense of the contractor and his sureties.

The city, town or joint powers board shall issue payments to contractors in accordance with W.S. 16-6-116(a).

Any officer or employee of the city, town or joint powers board who aids any bidder or respondent in securing a contract to furnish labor, material or supplies at a higher or lower price than that proposed by any other bidder or respondent, or who favors one bidder or respondent over another by giving or withholding information, or who willfully misleads any bidder or respondent in regard to the character of the material or supplies called for, or who knowingly certifies to a greater amount or different kind of material or supplies than has been actually received, is guilty of malfeasance, which renders his office vacant.

If an officer or employee is charged under subsection (j) of this section:

The officer or employee:

Is entitled to a hearing before the governing body;

Shall be served a copy of the charge at least ten (10) working days before the hearing;

May present a defense in person or by counsel; and

May have the finding of the governing body appealed to the district court.

The governing body of the city, town or joint powers board shall hold a hearing on its own motion or when the charge is signed by at least ten (10) qualified electors of the city or town, or in the case of a joint powers board ten (10) qualified electors of any member city or town and:

May compel attendance and testimony of witnesses and production of papers;

Shall make findings of fact and conclusions of law; and

Shall render a conclusive decision upon a majority vote of the governing body.

Any officer or employee of the city, town or joint powers board found guilty of malfeasance with regard to a contract shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).

If any person to whom a contract has been awarded has colluded with any person to prevent any other competing bids being made, or has entered into an agreement by which he has made a higher or lower bid than some other person for the purpose of dividing the contract or profits therefrom between two (2) or more bidders, the contract is null and void, and the mayor or manager or joint powers board shall advertise for new bids or upon approval of the governing body provide for the work to be done under the mayor’s, manager’s or board’s own supervision and control.

Any contract made in violation of the provisions of this section is void, and any money paid on account of the contract by the city, town or joint powers board may be recovered without restitution of the property or benefits received or retained.

Every contract of the kind specified in this section shall contain a provision expressly referring to this section and making it a part of the contract.

A public improvement shall not be divided into smaller units for the sole purpose of avoiding the advertising requirement of this section.

For purposes of this section “related costs” includes, but are not limited to, labor, labor burden, materials, transportation, storage, equipment, associated overhead and associated depreciation.

As used in this section, a contract for public improvement shall not include an arrangement in which a municipality can accomplish an energy or water efficiency project without upfront capital costs or capital appropriations by compensating an energy or water efficiency contractor over time from guaranteed savings in energy or water costs that result from the project.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-13; Laws 1969, ch. 163, § 1; 1973, ch. 72, § 1; 1979, ch. 72, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 15, § 1; ch. 33, § 1; 1985, ch. 209, § 1; 1987, ch. 206, § 1; 1989, ch. 158, § 2; 1999, ch. 178, § 1; 2006, ch. 98, § 2; 2007, ch. 128, § 1; 2008, ch. 117, § 1; 2009, ch. 123, § 2; 2012, ch. 106, § 1; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, inserted “or for response if a request for proposal or qualification for construction manager agent or construction manager at risk is used” in (a); inserted “or proposals” and “bids will be” in (b); in (c), added “If the contract is let for bid,” inserted the second sentence, inserted “or responses” in two places; inserted “or respondent” in (d) and (j); and inserted the exception language in (e).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “or design-builder” in (a), and made a related change.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000.00)” for “twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00)” in (a).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (s).

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00)” for “one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00)” in (d) and (f).

Laws 2012, ch. 106, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 21, 2012.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (d) substituted “a bond or other form of guarantee in accordance with W.S.

16-6-112

” for “a bond as specified in the advertisement, or if the contract price is one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00) or less, any other form of financial guarantee satisfactory to the city, town or joint powers board. The bond or other form of financial guarantee shall meet the requirements of W.S.

16-6-112

”; in (e) deleted the second sentence, which read “Except as provided under W.S.

16-6-701

through

16-6-706

, no contract may provide for the monthly retention of more than ten percent (10%) of the contract price on the amount of work done during the month, as shown by the estimate of the city or town engineer or designated local official” and added a new second sentence; and rewrote (h), which read “Before any contractor or his representative receives a final payment on any contract for which a bond or other financial guarantee is required, the city, town or joint powers board shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or town, or in the case of a joint powers board in any member city or town, at least ten (10) days prior to the final payment, a notice to the effect that persons having claims for labor and material furnished the contractor shall present them to the city, town or joint powers board prior to the date specified for payment.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Section is a general statute.

Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

But only one applicable to cities and towns. —

The only state statute pertaining to advertising for bids and appearing in those statutes applicable to cities and towns is this section. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Provisions of section are mandatory,

and a contract let in violation hereof is void. Tobin v. Town Council of Sundance, 45 Wyo. 219, 17 P.2d 666,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1933).

Members of city board of public utilities are fiduciaries and trustees

of the public interest, and they must always strive to secure specified services for the people for the least money. Centric Corp. v. Barbarossa & Sons, 521 P.2d 874,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 1974).

Material departure from bid specifications invalidates bid. —

While the city board of public utilities by statute must accept the lowest responsible bid, any material departure from the bid specifications invalidates a bid, and the defaulting party cannot be classed as a bidder. Centric Corp. v. Barbarossa & Sons, 521 P.2d 874,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 1974).

But minor irregularity does not justify rejection of lowest bid. —

A minor technical defect or irregularity which does not affect the substance of the bid does not justify the rejection of the lowest bid. Centric Corp. v. Barbarossa & Sons, 521 P.2d 874,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 1974).

One consideration given to determination whether departure from bid specifications is material

is whether or not a variation would give a bidder an advantage or benefit not allowed to other bidders so as to destroy the competitive character of the bidding process. Centric Corp. v. Barbarossa & Sons, 521 P.2d 874,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 1974).

Omission of material to be filed with a bid was minor

and inconsequential so as not to affect the substance of the bid justifying its rejection by the city board of public utilities. Centric Corp. v. Barbarossa & Sons, 521 P.2d 874,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 1974).

Court cannot require city board to accept bid. —

Although a court concludes that an omission with a bid was minor and inconsequential, it cannot require that the city board of public utilities must accept the bid. All the court can require is that the board cannot reject the bid on the basis of the omission where the bid submitted is the lowest. Centric Corp. v. Barbarossa & Sons, 521 P.2d 874,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 1974).

No recession of bid because of mistake. —

A construction company that had submitted a bid to a city for the construction of a fire station was not entitled to rescind its bid without penalty because of a mistake in computing the amount of the bid. However, pursuant to an agreement made in the course of a declaratory judgment action, the city stated they would abide by the decision of the district court with respect to the company's right to rescind. When the district court ruled the company was entitled to rescind its bid, this ruling, though erroneous, was upheld, because of a strong public policy in favor of settlement of litigation. City of Cheyenne v. Reiman Corp., 869 P.2d 125,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1994).

Fixed rate formula in power contract held reasonable. —

Fixed rate formula agreed upon in a power contract between municipalities organizing an agency under the Wyoming Joint Powers Act, §§

16-1-102

through

16-1-109

, to produce and distribute electric power to their inhabitants was reasonable. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Effect of violation of section on parties. —

Where contract was let in violation of this section for street improvements, contractor could not recover on the theory that municipality ratified contract by accepting work and was therefore estopped to deny its liability. Tobin v. Town Council of Sundance, 45 Wyo. 219, 17 P.2d 666,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1933).

Where a contract was let in violation of the competitive bidding and expenditures in excess of appropriation statute and was held void, town, accepting and retaining benefit of street improvements, under the circumstances, cannot recover back money paid under the void contract. Tobin v. Town Council of Sundance, 45 Wyo. 219, 17 P.2d 666,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1933).

Contractor could not recover upon implied contract

for work and material. Tobin v. Town Council of Sundance, 45 Wyo. 219, 17 P.2d 666,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1933).

Contractor could not recover though city officers testified they could not find anyone else who would, or could, do the work. Tobin v. Town Council of Sundance, 45 Wyo. 219, 17 P.2d 666,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1933).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div. v. Bergeron, 948 P.2d 1367,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1997).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Competitive Bidding on Public Works in Wyoming: Determination of Responsibility and Preference,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 243 (1976).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Public works or contract, right of public authorities to reject all bids for, 31 ALR2d 469., 52 ALR4th 186.

Revocation, prior to execution of formal written contract, of vote for decision of public body awarding contract to bidder, 3 ALR3d 864.

Right of municipal corporation to recover back from contractor payments made under contract violating competitive bidding statute, 33 ALR3d 397.

Liability of municipality on quasi contract for value of property or work furnished without compliance with bidding requirements, 33 ALR3d 1164.

Waiver of competitive bidding requirements for state and local public building and construction contracts, 40 ALR4th 968.

Public contracts: authority of state or its subdivision to reject all bids, 52 ALR4th 186.

Construction and effect of “changed conditions” clause in public works or construction contract with state or its subdivision, 56 ALR4th 1042.

Public contracts: low bidder's monetary relief against state or local agency for nonaward of contract, 65 ALR4th 93.

Standing of disappointed bidder on public contract to seek damages under 42 USC § 1983 for public authorities' alleged violation of bidding procedures, 86 ALR Fed 904.

§ 15-1-114.
Ordinances; required for legislation; exceptions; how proved.

All municipal legislation shall be by ordinance, unless provided otherwise by law, except that licenses may be granted by resolution.

All ordinances may be proved by the certificate of the clerk, under the seal of the city or town, and when printed or published in book or pamphlet form, and purporting to be published by authority of the city or town, shall be read and received in all courts and places without further proof.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 14, 19; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-14, 15.1-19; W.S. 1977, §§

15-1-114

,

15-1-119

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Meaning of “legislation.” —

Absent a specific requirement that it act by ordinance, town was empowered to act by resolution in authorizing debt for municipal water project. Cooper v. Town of Pinedale, 1 P.3d 1197,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2000).

Admissibility of ordinance in evidence. —

Under the direct provisions of this section, a municipal ordinance, certified by the clerk under the seal of the town, is admissible in evidence. Meldrum v. State, 23 Wyo. 12, 146 P. 596,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1915).

§ 15-1-115.
Ordinances; form and style; presumption; manner of enactment; vote required.

All ordinances shall be in writing and passed pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the governing body. No ordinance, except one making appropriations or one for the codification or general revision of ordinances, may contain more than one (1) subject which shall be expressed clearly in the title. Ordinances making appropriations and ordinances relating to codification or general revision of ordinances shall be limited to those subjects. The style of all ordinances shall be: “Be it ordained by the governing body of the city (town) of . . . . . ”.

Every ordinance relating to the codification or general revision of ordinances which has been passed and adopted prior to the effective date of this section, and is otherwise in conformance with this section, is deemed to meet the requirement that an ordinance shall not contain more than one (1) subject which shall be expressed clearly in the title.

Every ordinance shall be publicly read on three (3) different days. Public reading may be by title only. At least ten (10) days shall elapse between the introduction and final passage of every ordinance. For an emergency ordinance, the requirements of this section may be suspended by the affirmative vote of three-fourths (3/4) of the qualified members of the governing body. No franchise may be granted by emergency ordinance.

Passage of an ordinance requires the affirmative vote of the majority of the qualified members of the governing body. Passage of an emergency ordinance requires the affirmative vote of three-fourths (3/4) of the qualified members of the governing body.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-15; Laws 1959, ch. 159, § 1; 1979, ch. 28, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 15, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision that ordinances, etc., shall remain in effect upon city or town becoming first class city, see §

15-3-103

.

As to veto power of mayor, see §

15-3-201

.

As to right of person whose rights are affected by a municipal ordinance, etc., to obtain a declaration of rights, status or other legal relation thereunder, see §

1-37-103

.

As to parties generally in proceedings under Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act involving validity of ordinance or franchise, see §

1-37-113

.

Stated

in

Blount v. City of Laramie, 510 P.2d 294,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1973).